ro-RO: Articole sportive > Atletism > Echipament pentru broomball: Genți de broomball; Mingi de broomball; Mături pentru broomball; Porți pentru broomball; Echipament de protecție pentru broomball; Încălțăminte pentru broomball
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Atletické sporty > Vybavení na broomball: Tašky na broomball; Míčky na broomball; Košťata na broomball; Branky na broomball; Chrániče na broomball; Boty na broomball
fr: Équipements sportifs > Divers sports > Équipement de ballon-balai: Sacs de ballon-balai; Balles de ballon-balai; Balais de ballon-balai; Buts de ballon-balai; Équipement de protection de ballon-balai; Chaussures de ballon-balai
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Điền kinh > Dụng cụ chơi bóng vợt: Túi đựng đồ broomball; Quả bóng vợt; Gậy bóng vợt; Gôn bóng vợt; Đồ bảo hộ chơi broomball; Giày broomball
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Atletika > Oprema za metlomet: Torbe za metlomet; Loptice za metlomet; Metle za metlomet; Golovi za metlomet; Zaštitna oprema za metlomet; Obuća za metlomet
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividade desportiva > Equipamento para broomball: Sacos de broomball; Bolas para broomball; Vassouras para broomball; Balizas para broomball; Equipamento de proteção de broomball; Calçado de broomball
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Urheilu > Luutapallovälineet: Broomball-kassit; Luutapallon pallot; Luutapallon luudat; Luutapallon maalit; Broomball-suojavarusteet; Broomball-kengät
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Atletika > Vybavenie pre metlobal: Tašky na metlobal; Lopty pre metlobal; Metly pre metlobal; Bránky pre metlobal; Ochranné vybavenie na metlobal; Obuv na metlobal
en: Sporting Goods > Athletics > Broomball Equipment: Broomball Bags; Broomball Balls; Broomball Brooms; Broomball Goals; Broomball Protective Gear; Broomball Shoes
ru: Спортивные товары > Соревновательный спорт > Инвентарь для брумбола: Сумки для брумбола; Мячи для брумбола; Метлы для брумбола; Ворота для брумбола; Защитная экипировка для брумбола; Обувь для брумбола
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sport > Sprzęt do gry w broomball: Torby do broomballu; Kule do gry w broomball; Miotły do gry w broomball; Bramki do gry w broomball; Sprzęt ochronny do broomballu; Buty do broomballu
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Atletika > Šluotbolo įranga: Šluotbolo krepšiai; Šluotbolo kamuoliukai; Šluotbolo šluotos; Šluotbolo vartai; Šluotbolo apsauginės priemonės; Šluotbolo batai
hu: Sportszerek > Atlétika > Broomball-felszerelés: Seprűkorong táskák; Broomball-labdák; Broomball-seprűk; Broomball-kapuk; Seprűkorong védőfelszerelés; Seprűkorong cipők
nl: Sportartikelen > Lichaamssporten > Broomballbenodigdheden: Broomballtassen; Broomballballen; Broomballbezems; Broomballdoelen; Beschermende uitrusting voor broomball; Broomballschoenen
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Šport > Oprema za metlomet: Vreče za metlomet; Žoge za metlomet; Metle za metlomet; Goli za metlomet; Zaščitna oprema za metlomet; Čevlji za metlomet
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friidrett > Broomballutstyr: Broomball-bager; Broomball-baller; Broomball-koster; Broomball-mål; Beskyttelsesutstyr for broomball; Broomball-sko
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipamiento para atletismo > Equipamiento para Broomball: Bolsos para broomball; Bolas para Broomball; Escobas para Broomball; Metas para Broomball; Equipo de protección para broomball; Zapatillas para broomball
de: Sportartikel > Athletik > Broomball-Ausrüstung: Broomballtaschen; Broomball-Bälle; Broomball-Schläger; Broomball-Tore; Broomball-Schutzausrüstung; Broomballschuhe
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Αθλητισμός > Εξοπλισμός μπρουμπόλ: Τσάντες broomball; Μπάλες μπρουμπόλ; Σκούπες μπρουμπόλ; Τέρματα μπρουμπόλ; Προστατευτικός εξοπλισμός broomball; Παπούτσια broomball
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Artigos para prática de esportes > Equipamento de broomball: Bolsas para broomball; Bolas de broomball; Vassouras de broomball; Gols de broomball; Equipamentos de proteção para broomball; Tênis para broomball
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > การกีฬา > อุปกรณ์บรูมบอล: กระเป๋าใส่อุปกรณ์บรูมบอล; ลูกบรูมบอล; ไม้กวาดบรูมบอล; ประตูบรูมบอล; อุปกรณ์ป้องกันตัวบรูมบอล; รองเท้าบรูมบอล
ko: 스포츠용품 > 운동 > 브룸볼 장비: 브룸볼 가방; 브룸볼 공; 브룸볼 스틱; 브룸볼 골대; 브룸볼 보호 장구; 브룸볼화
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Spor Ekipmanları > Broomball Malzemeleri: Broomball çantaları; Broomball Topları; Broomball Süpürgeleri; Broomball Kaleleri; Broomball koruyucu ekipmanları; Broomball ayakkabıları
sv: Sportartiklar > Idrott och sport > Broomball: Broomball-väskor; Broomball-bollar; Broomball-kvastar; Broomball-mål; Skyddsutrustning för broomball; Broomball-skor
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания > Екипировка за брумбол: Чанти за брумбол; Топки за брумбол; Метли за брумбол; Врати за брумбол; Защитно облекло за брумбол; Обувки за брумбол
ja: スポーツ用品 > スポーツ競技 > ブルームボール用品: ブルームボール用バッグ; ブルームボール用ボール; ブルームボール用ブルーム; ブルームボール用ゴール; ブルームボール用プロテクター; ブルームボール用シューズ
it: Articoli sportivi > Sport > Attrezzature da broomball: Borse da broomball; Palle da broomball; Mazze da broomball; Obiettivi di broomball; Protezioni da broomball; Scarpe da broomball
da: Sportsartikler > Atletik > Broomballudstyr: Broomball-tasker; Broomball-bolde; Broomball-koste; Broomball-mål; Beskyttelsesudstyr til broomball; Broomball-sko
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 田径 > 扫帚球装备: 扫帚冰球包; 扫帚球; 扫帚球扫帚; 扫帚球球门; 扫帚冰球防护装备; 扫帚冰球鞋
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 競技體育 > 掃帚球裝備: 掃帚球裝備袋; 掃帚球; 掃帚球棒; 掃帚球門; 掃帚球護具; 掃帚球鞋